sl-SI: Primerno za vrsto barve: Akril; Akril in olje (univerzalno); Gvaš; Črnilo; Mešane tehnike; Olje; Tempera; Z vodo mešljivo olje; Akvarel (pri posebni pripravi); Drugo
sk-SK: Vhodné pre typ farby: Akryl; Akryl a olej (univerzálne); Kvaš; Atrament; Zmiešané médiá; Olej; Tempera; Vodou riediteľný olej; Akvarel (po špeciálnej úprave); Iné
sv: Lämplig för typ av färg: Akryl; Akryl och olja (universell); Gouache; Bläck; Blandteknik; Olja; Tempera; Vattenblandbar olja; Akvarell (när den är speciellt preparerad); Övrigt
pt-PT: Tipo adequado de tinta: Acrílico; Acrílico e óleo (universal); Guache; Tinta; Técnica mista; Óleo; Têmpera; Óleo solúvel em água; Aguarela (quando especialmente preparada); Outro
ko: 적합한 페인트 유형: 아크릴; 아크릴 및 유화(범용); 과슈; 잉크; 혼합 미디어; 유화; 템페라; 수용성 유화; 수채화(특수 처리가 된 경우); 기타
th: เหมาะสำหรับประเภทสี: อะคริลิก; อะคริลิกและน้ำมัน (อเนกประสงค์); กวอช; หมึก; สื่อผสม; สีน้ำมัน; เทมเพอรา; สีน้ำมันแบบผสมน้ำได้; สีน้ำ (เมื่อเตรียมเป็นพิเศษ); อื่นๆ
de: Geeignet für Farbart: Acryl; Acryl & Öl (universell); Gouache; Tinte; Mixed Media; Öl; Tempera; Wassermischbares Öl; Aquarell (wenn speziell vorbereitet); Sonstige
fi: Soveltuu maalityypille: Akryyli; Akryyli ja öljy (yleinen); Guassi; Muste; Sekatekniikka; Öljy; Tempera; Vesiohenteinen öljy; Akvarelli (erityisesti valmisteltuna); Muu
it: Adatto per tipo di vernice: Acrilico; Acrilico e olio (universale); Gouache; Inchiostro; Tecnica mista; Olio; Tempera; Olio idrosolubile; Acquerello (se preparato appositamente); Altro
hu: A következő festéktípusokhoz alkalmas:: Akril; Akril és olaj (univerzális); Gouache; Tinta; Vegyes technika; Olaj; Tempera; Vízzel keverhető olaj; Akvarell (speciálisan előkészítve); Egyéb
bg-BG: Подходящо за тип боя: Акрилни бои; Акрилни и маслени бои (универсални); Гуаш; Туш; Смесена техника; Маслени бои; Темперни бои; Водоразтворими маслени бои; Акварелни бои (при специална подготовка); Друго
cs: Vhodné pro typ barvy: Akryl; Akryl a olej (univerzální); Kvaš; Tuš; Kombinovaná technika; Olej; Tempera; Vodou ředitelný olej; Akvarel (při speciální přípravě); Jiné
el: Κατάλληλο για τύπο βαφής: Ακρυλικό; Ακρυλικό και λάδι (για όλες τις χρήσεις); Γκουάς; Μελάνι; Μεικτή τεχνική; Λάδι; Τέμπερα; Υδατοδιαλυτό λάδι; Ακουαρέλα (με ειδική προετοιμασία); Άλλο
fr: Convient pour ce type de peinture: Acrylique; Acrylique et huile (universel); Gouache; Encre; Technique mixte; Huile; Tempera; Huile miscible à l’eau; Aquarelle (si préparation spéciale); Autre
tr: Uygun boya türü: Akrilik; Akrilik ve yağlı boya (evrensel); Guaj; Mürekkep; Karışık teknik; Yağlı boya; Tempera; Suyla karışabilen yağlı boya; Sulu boya (özel hazırlandığında); Diğer
hr-HR: Vrsta boje za koju je prikladno: Akrilne boje; Akrilne i uljane boje (univerzalne); Gvaš; Tinta; Miješane tehnike; Uljane boje; Tempera; Uljane boje topive u vodi; Vodene boje (kada su posebno pripremljene); Ostalo
nb: Egnet for malingstype: Akryl; Akryl og olje (universell); Gouache; Blekk; Blandingsteknikk; Olje; Tempera; Vannblandbar olje; Akvarell (når spesielt forberedt); Annet
pt-BR: Adequado para o tipo de tinta: Acrílica; Acrílica e óleo (universal); Guache; Tinta; Técnicas mistas; Óleo; Têmpera; Óleo solúvel em água; Aquarela (quando especialmente preparada); Outras
ro-RO: Potrivit pentru tipul de vopsea: Acrilic; Acrilic și ulei (universal); Guașă; Cerneală; Tehnici mixte; Ulei; Tempera; Ulei solubil în apă; Acuarelă (dacă este special preparată); Altele
es: Adecuado para tipo de pintura: Acrílico; Acrílico y óleo (universal); Gouache; Tinta; Técnica mixta; Óleo; Témpera; Óleo miscible al agua; Acuarela (con preparación especial); Otro
lt-LT: Tinka dažų tipui: Akrilas; Akrilas ir aliejus (universalus); Guašas; Rašalas; Mišri technika; Aliejus; Tempera; Vandeniu skiedžiamas aliejus; Akvarelė (specialiai paruošta); Kitas
zh-CN: 适用颜料类型: 丙烯; 丙烯和油画（通用）; 水粉; 墨水; 混合媒体; 油画; 蛋彩画; 水溶性油画; 水彩（特殊制备）; 其他
ja: ペイントタイプに最適: アクリル; アクリル＆油彩 (兼用); ガッシュ; インク; ミクストメディア; 油彩; テンペラ; 水溶性油彩; 水彩 (特別に準備された場合); その他
pl: Odpowiednie do typu farby: Farby akrylowe; Akryl i olej (uniwersalne); Gwasz; Tusz; Technika mieszana; Farby olejne; Tempera; Farby olejne wodorozcieńczalne; Akwarele (po specjalnym przygotowaniu); Inne
nl: Geschikt voor verfsoort: Acryl; Acryl en olie (universeel); Gouache; Inkt; Mixed media; Olie; Tempera; Watermengbare olie; Aquarel (indien speciaal geprepareerd); Overig
zh-TW: 適用顏料類型: 壓克力顏料; 壓克力和油畫顏料 (通用); 不透明水彩; 墨水; 複合媒材; 油畫顏料; 蛋彩; 水性油畫顏料; 水彩 (經特殊處理); 其他
da: Egnet malingstype: Akryl; Akryl og olie (universel); Gouache; Blæk; Blandede medier; Olie; Tempera; Vandblandbar olie; Akvarel (hvis specielt forberedt); Andet
en: Suitable for paint type: Acrylic; Acrylic & oil (universal); Gouache; Ink; Mixed media; Oil; Tempera; Water-mixable oil; Watercolor (when specially prepared); Other
ru: Подходящие типы краски: Акрил; Акрил и масло (универсальная); Гуашь; Тушь; Смешанные техники; Масло; Темпера; Водорастворимое масло; Акварель (при специальной подготовке); Другое
vi: Phù hợp với loại sơn: Acrylic; Acrylic & sơn dầu (đa dụng); Gouache; Mực; Chất liệu hỗn hợp; Sơn dầu; Tempera; Sơn dầu pha nước; Màu nước (khi được pha chế đặc biệt); Khác